Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-301
Act, how cited.

Sections 86-301 to 86-315 shall be known and may be cited as the Telecommunications Relay System Act.

Laws 1993, LB 305, § 23;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-1301;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 179.